Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.413.080

Paraeducator subject matter certificates.

(1) The board shall adopt requirements and policies for paraeducator subject matter certificates in special education and in English language learner that are based on the recommendations of the paraeducator work group established in chapter 136, Laws of 2014.

(2) The rules adopted by the board must include the following requirements:

(a) A subject matter certificate is not a prerequisite for a paraeducator working in any program;

(b) Paraeducators may become eligible for a subject matter certificate by completing twenty hours of professional development in the subject area of the certificate; and

(c) Subject matter certificates expire after five years.

[ 2017 c 237 s 9.]